Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 2. PROTECTION OF LABORERS

SUBTITLE A. EMPLOYMENT DISCRIMINATION

CHAPTER 22. EMPLOYMENT DISCRIMINATION FOR PARTICIPATING IN EMERGENCY EVACUATION

Sec. 22.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Disaster" means the occurrence or imminent threat of widespread or severe damage, injury, or loss of life or property that results from a natural or man-made cause, including fire, flood, earthquake, wind, storm, wave action, oil spill or other water contamination, volcanic activity, epidemic, air contamination, blight, drought, infestation, explosion, riot, hostile military or paramilitary action, or other public calamity requiring emergency action, or an energy emergency.

(2) "Emergency evacuation order" means an official statement issued by the governing body of this state or a political subdivision of this state to recommend the evacuation of all or part of the population of an area stricken or threatened with a disaster. The term includes a declaration of local disaster under Section 418.108, Government Code.

(3) "Emergency services personnel" includes fire fighters, police officers and other peace officers, emergency medical technicians, and other individuals who are required, in the course and scope of their employment, to provide services for the benefit of the general public during emergency situations.

(4) "Employee" means an individual who is employed by an employer for compensation.

(5) "Employer" means a person who employs one or more employees.

(6) "Political subdivision" means a county, municipality, special district, or authority of this state.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 9.09(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 22.002. DISCRIMINATION PROHIBITED. An employer may not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against an employee who leaves the employee's place of employment to participate in a general public evacuation ordered under an emergency evacuation order.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 9.09(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 22.003. LIABILITY; REINSTATEMENT. (a) An employer who violates Section 22.002 is liable for any loss of wages and employer-provided benefits incurred by the employee as a result of the violation.

(b) A person discharged in violation of Section 22.002 is entitled to reinstatement in the same or an equivalent position of employment with commensurate pay.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 9.09(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 22.004. EXEMPTION; EMERGENCY SERVICES PERSONNEL. (a) Section 22.002 does not apply to individuals employed as emergency services personnel if the employer provides adequate emergency shelter for those individuals.

(b) This chapter does not apply to a person who is necessary to provide for the safety and well-being of the general public, including a person necessary for the restoration of vital services.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 9.09(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.